Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB600.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2807(f)(2)(ii) and (g) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (f) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(f) Smart meter technology and time of use rates.--* * *(2) Electric distribution companies shall furnish smart meter technology as follows:* * *(ii) In new building construction[.], the electric distribution company shall give the customer the choice of either an analog meter or a smart meter. The electric 12345678910111213141516171819 distribution company shall document in writing the choice made by the customer according to a procedure adopted for that purpose by the electric distribution company. If no choice is made by the customer, the electric distribution company shall install an analog meter.* * *(2.1) A customer has the right to o pt out , at any time, of a previously installed smart meter according to a procedure adopted for that purpose by the electric distribution company.(2.2) An electric distribution company may not charge a customer a fee for exercising the right to o pt out of a smart meter under paragraph (2)(ii) or (2.1).(2.3) If a customer opts out of a smart meter under paragraph (2)(ii) or (2.1), the electric distribution company shall install an analog meter.(2.4) An electric distribution company shall include on its publicly accessible Internet website, and make available to customers who call customer support, information about the procedure for customers to o pt out of smart meters. * * *(g) [Definition.--As used in this section, the term "smart] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Smart meter." A meter for electricity usage that operates on smart meter technology."Smart meter [technology" means technology] technology." Technology, including metering technology and network communications technology capable of bidirectional 20250SB0600PN0606 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communication, that records electricity usage on at least an hourly basis, including related electric distribution system upgrades to enable the technology. The technology shall provide customers with direct access to and use of price and consumption information. The technology shall also:(1) Directly provide customers with information on their hourly consumption.(2) Enable time-of-use rates and real-time price programs.(3) Effectively support the automatic control of the customer's electricity consumption by one or more of the following as selected by the customer:(i) the customer;(ii) the customer's utility; or(iii) a third party engaged by the customer or the customer's utility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0600PN0606 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617